Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.836

Disclosure to individual of own record—Fee.

An individual may contact the state patrol to ascertain whether an individual has a conviction record. The state patrol shall disclose such information, subject to the fee established under RCW 43.43.838.

[ 2005 c 421 s 4; 1987 c 486 s 4.]